apertium-oci.oci.metadix
        <pardef n="ami/ar__vblex">        
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>aríem</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>aríem</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>ariam</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>aria</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>aria</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>ariái</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>aríetz</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>aríetz</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>ariatz</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>aries</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>aries</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>ariás</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>arien</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>arien</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>arián</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>arie</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>arie</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>ariá</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>aram</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>aram</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>arem</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>arè</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>arè</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>arai</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>aratz</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>aratz</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>aretz</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>aràs</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>aràn</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>arà</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>ant</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>ant</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantant"/></e>                
      <e><p><l>èrem</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>è</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>è</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>èt</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>èretz</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ès</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ères</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>èren</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>èren</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>èron</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>èc</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>èc</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    <e alt="oci"><p><l>èt</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>em</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>em</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>egam</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ésquem</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>egam</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ésquem</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>atz</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>atz</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>                
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sigues"/></e>                
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantant"/></e>                
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cante"/></e>                
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>        
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>à</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ac"/></e>        
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>à</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__ac"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>à</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>àuem</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>àuem</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>aua</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>aua</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@aran"><p><l>àuetz</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
    <e alt="oci@gascon"><p><l>àuetz</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                

    <e lm="amiar"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="amiar entà deuant" alt="oci"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>entà<b/>deuant</l><r><g><b/>entà<b/>deuant</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="amiar entà deuant" alt="oci@aran"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>entà<b/>deuant</l><r><g><b/>entà<b/>deuant</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="amiar entà deuant" alt="oci@gascon"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>entà<b/>deuant</l><r><g><b/>entà<b/>deuant</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="amiar entà dauant" r="LR"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>entà<b/>dauant</l><r><g><b/>entà<b/>dauant</g></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="amiar a tèrme" alt="oci"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>tèrme</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>tèrme</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="amiar a tèrme" alt="oci@aran"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>tèrme</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>tèrme</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="amiar a tèrme" alt="oci@gascon"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>tèrme</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>tèrme</g></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="amiar" alt="oci"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="amiar" alt="oci@aran"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="amiar" alt="oci@gascon"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ampliar" r="LR"><i>ampli</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="continuar" r="LR"><i>continu</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="desacadiar" alt="oci"><i>desacadi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="desacadiar" alt="oci@aran"><i>desacadi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="desacadiar" alt="oci@gascon"><i>desacadi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="acadiar" alt="oci"><i>acadi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="acadiar" alt="oci@aran"><i>acadi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="acadiar" alt="oci@gascon"><i>acadi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="desviar"><i>desvi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="efectuar"><i>efectu</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="enviar"><i>envi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="esquiar"><i>esqui</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="evacuar"><i>evacu</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fotografiar"><i>fotografi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="apraiar" alt="oci"><i>aprai</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="apraiar" alt="oci@aran"><i>aprai</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="apraiar" alt="oci@gascon"><i>aprai</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="consensuar" r="LR"><i>consensu</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="desentorniar" r="LR"><i>desentorni</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="esgariar" alt="oci"><i>esgari</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="esgariar" alt="oci@aran"><i>esgari</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="esgariar" alt="oci@gascon"><i>esgari</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="horaviar" r="LR"><i>horavi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hòraviar" r="LR"><i>hòravi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="propiciar"><i>propici</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="confiar"><i>confi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="criar"><i>cri</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="abituar"><i>abitu</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="insinuar"><i>insinu</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aliar" a="carmentano"><i>ali</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="amonestar" a=" mmonge"><i>amonest</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beneficiar" a=" mmonge"><i>benefici</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="actuar" a=" mmonge" alt="oci"><i>actu</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="actuar" a=" mmonge" alt="oci@aran"><i>actu</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="subsidiar" a="mmonge"><i>subsidi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="afiliar" a="carmentano" alt="oci"><i>afili</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afiliar" a="carmentano" alt="oci@gascon"><i>afili</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="desafiar" a=" mmonge"><i>desafi</i><par n="ami/ar__vblex"/></e>
